Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2317.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 613-A(c) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended to read:Section 613-A. Department of Labor and Industry to Collect 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 Fees.--* * *(c) The following apply:(1) Beginning one year after the effective date of this section, and annually thereafter, all fees listed in this section shall increase at the rate of inflation as outlined in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers in the Northeast Region for the most recent 12-month period for which the figures have been reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. If the rate of inflation does not increase, all fees shall remain the same as they were for the previous year. The department shall publish fee increases in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) Paragraph (1) shall expire upon the effective date of this paragraph. The fees specified in the Bureau of Occupational and Industrial Safety Fee Schedule Update of the department, published at 55 Pa.B. 7826 (November 8, 2025), shall remain in effect after the expiration of paragraph (1).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2317PN3091 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819